Utah statutes.
10-6-141.   City treasurer -- Duties generally.
(1)  The city treasurer is custodian of all money, bonds, or other securities
of the city.
(2)  The city treasurer shall:
(a)  determine the cash requirements of the city and provide for the
investment of all money by following the procedures and requirements of Title
51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;
(b)  receive all public funds and money payable to the city, within three
business days after collection, including all taxes, licenses, fines, and
intergovernmental revenue;
(c)  keep an accurate detailed account of all money received under Subsection
(2)(b) in the manner provided in this chapter and as directed by the
legislative body of the city by ordinance or resolution; and
(d)  collect all special taxes and assessments as provided by law and
ordinance.
